California, session 20252026, AB1127.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3273.50 of the Civil Code is amended to read:3273.50. As used in this title, the following definitions apply:(a) “Ammunition” has the same meaning as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 16150 of the Penal Code.(b) “Firearm” has the same meaning as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16520 of the Penal Code.(c) “Firearm accessory” means an attachment or device designed or adapted to be inserted into, affixed onto, or used in conjunction with a firearm that is designed, intended, or functions to alter or enhance the firing capabilities of a firearm, the lethality of the firearm, or a shooter’s ability to hold and use a firearm.(d) “Firearm-related product” means a firearm, ammunition, a firearm precursor part, a firearm component, firearm manufacturing machine, and a firearm accessory that meets any of the following conditions:(1) The item is sold, made, or distributed in California.(2) The item is intended to be sold or distributed in California.(3) The item is or was possessed in California and it was reasonably foreseeable that the item would be possessed in California.(e) “Firearm precursor part” has the same meaning as provided in Section 16531 of the Penal Code.(f) “Firearm industry member” shall mean a person, firm, corporation, company, partnership, society, joint stock company, or any other entity or association engaged in the manufacture, distribution, importation, marketing, wholesale sale, or retail sale of firearm-related products.(g) “Firearm manufacturing machine” means a three-dimensional printer, as defined in Section 29185 of the Penal Code, or CNC milling machine that, as described in that section, is marketed or sold as, or reasonably designed or intended to be used to manufacture or produce a firearm.(h) “Reasonable controls” means reasonable procedures, acts, or practices that are designed, implemented, and enforced to do the following:(1) Prevent the sale or distribution of a firearm-related product to a straw purchaser, a firearm trafficker, a person prohibited from possessing a firearm under state or federal law, or a person who the firearm industry member has reasonable cause to believe is at substantial risk of using a firearm-related product to harm themselves or another or of possessing or using a firearm-related product unlawfully.(2) Prevent the loss or theft of a firearm-related product from the firearm industry member.(3) Ensure that the firearm industry member complies with all provisions of California and federal law and does not otherwise promote the unlawful manufacture, sale, possession, marketing, or use of a firearm-related product.(4) Prevent the installation and use of a pistol converter, as defined in Section 17015 of the Penal Code, with a firearm.SEC. 1.5. Section 3273.50 of the Civil Code is amended to read:3273.50. As used in this title, the following definitions apply:(a) “Ammunition” has the same meaning as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 16150 of the Penal Code.(b) “Firearm” has the same meaning as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16520 of the Penal Code.(c) “Firearm accessory” means an attachment or device designed or adapted to be inserted into, affixed onto, or used in conjunction with a firearm that is designed, intended, or functions to increase a firearm’s rate of fire or to increase the speed at which a person may reload a firearm or replace the magazine, or any other attachment or device described in subdivision (a) of Section 30515 of the Penal Code that may render a firearm an assault weapon when inserted into, affixed onto, or used in conjunction with a firearm. The term firearm accessory also includes any other device, tool, kit, part, or parts set that is clearly designed and intended for use in manufacturing firearms.(d) “Firearm-related product” means a firearm, ammunition, a firearm precursor part, a firearm component, firearm manufacturing machine, and a firearm accessory that meets any of the following conditions:(1) The item is sold, made, or distributed in California.(2) The item is intended to be sold or distributed in California.(3) The item is or was possessed in California and it was reasonably foreseeable that the item would be possessed in California.(e) “Firearm precursor part” has the same meaning as provided in Section 16531 of the Penal Code.(f) “Firearm industry member” shall mean a person, firm, corporation, company, partnership, society, joint stock company, or any other entity or association engaged in the manufacture, distribution, importation, marketing, wholesale sale, or retail sale of firearm-related products.(g) “Firearm manufacturing machine” means a three-dimensional printer, as defined in Section 29185 of the Penal Code, a computer numerical control (CNC) milling machine, or a similar machine, that is marketed or sold as or is reasonably designed or intended to be used to manufacture or produce firearms, firearm components, or firearm accessories.(h) “Reasonable controls” means reasonable procedures, acts, or practices that are designed, implemented, and enforced to do the following:(1) Prevent the sale or distribution of a firearm-related product to a straw purchaser, a firearm trafficker, a person prohibited from possessing a firearm under state or federal law, or a person who the firearm industry member has reasonable cause to believe is at substantial risk of using a firearm-related product to harm themselves or another or of possessing or using a firearm-related product unlawfully.(2) Prevent the loss or theft of a firearm-related product from the firearm industry member.(3) Ensure that the firearm industry member complies with all provisions of California and federal law and does not otherwise promote the unlawful manufacture, sale, possession, marketing, or use of a firearm-related product.(4) Prevent the installation and use of a pistol converter, as defined in Section 17015 of the Penal Code, with a firearm.SEC. 2. Section 16880 of the Penal Code is amended to read:16880. (a) As used in this part, “machinegun” means any weapon that shoots, is designed to shoot, or can readily be restored to shoot, automatically more than one shot, without manual reloading, by a single function of the trigger.(b) The term “machinegun” also includes the frame or receiver of any weapon described in subdivision (a), any part designed and intended solely and exclusively, or combination of parts designed and intended, for use in converting a weapon into a machinegun, and any combination of parts from which a machinegun can be assembled if those parts are in the possession or under the control of a person.(c) The term “machinegun” also includes any weapon deemed by the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives as readily convertible to a machinegun under Chapter 53 (commencing with Section 5801) of Title 26 of the United States Code.(d) The term “machinegun” also includes any machinegun-convertible pistol equipped with a pistol converter, as defined in Section 17015.SEC. 3. Section 16885 is added to the Penal Code, to read:16885. (a) As used in this part, “machinegun-convertible pistol” means any semiautomatic pistol with a cruciform trigger bar that can be readily converted by hand or with common household tools, as defined in Section 4082 of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations, into a machinegun by the installation or attachment of a pistol converter as a replacement for the slide’s backplate without any additional engineering, machining, or modification of the pistol’s trigger mechanism.(b) A machinegun-convertible pistol does not include a hammer-fired semiautomatic pistol or striker-fired semiautomatic pistol lacking a cruciform trigger bar, which instead has a trigger bar that is shielded from interference by a pistol converter.(c) A polymer notch or other piece of polymer molded into the rear of the pistol frame does not prevent ready conversion into a machinegun and will not prevent a pistol from qualifying under this definition.SEC. 4. Section 17015 is added to the Penal Code, to read:17015. “Pistol converter” means any device or instrument that when installed in or attached to the rear of the slide of a semiautomatic pistol, replaces the backplate, and interferes with the trigger mechanism and thereby enables the pistol to shoot automatically more than one shot by a single function of the trigger. A pistol converter includes, but is not limited to, a pistol converter manufactured using a three-dimensional printer, as defined in Section 29185.SEC. 5. Section 27595 is added to the Penal Code, to read:27595. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), commencing on July 1, 2026, a firearms dealer licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26920, shall not sell, offer for sale, exchange, give, transfer, or deliver any semiautomatic machinegun-convertible pistol, as defined in Section 16885.(b) (1) A violation of subdivision (a) shall be punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).(2) A second violation of subdivision (a) shall be punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and may result in the suspension or revocation of the dealer’s license issued under Sections 26700 to 26920, inclusive, and removal of the firearms dealer from any centralized list maintained by the Department of Justice pursuant to Sections 26715, 28450, and 29060.(3) A third violation of subdivision (a) is a misdemeanor and shall result in the revocation of the dealer’s license issued under Sections 26700 to 26920, inclusive, and removal of the firearms dealer from any centralized list maintained by the Department pursuant to Sections 26715, 28450, and 29060.(c) This section shall not apply to any of the following:(1) A machinegun-convertible pistol delivered to a firearms dealer prior to January 1, 2026.(2) The sale of a machinegun-convertible pistol to any of the following entities for lawful use in the discharge of their official duties:(A) A police department, sheriff’s office, probation department, marshal’s office, district attorney’s office, the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Justice, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.(B) Any state agency listed in paragraph (6) or paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 32000.(C) The military or naval forces of this state or of the United States.(3) A private party to private party transaction conducted through a licensed firearms dealer pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050).(4) A transfer of a machinegun-convertible pistol to a gunsmith or other qualified entity for service or repair.(5) The sale or transfer of a machinegun-convertible pistol to a firearms dealer licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26920, inclusive, or to federally licensed firearms manufacturers or dealers outside California.(6) A transfer of a machinegun-convertible pistol back to a private party after temporary safekeeping storage pursuant to Section 26892.(7) A transfer of a machinegun-convertible pistol back to a private party after a period of temporary prohibition pursuant to Section 29830.(8) A transfer of a machinegun-convertible pistol to any forensic laboratory or forensic laboratory employee, while on duty and acting within the scope and course of employment.(9) The sale of a machinegun-convertible pistol to an individual who is an active peace officer described in Section 830.1 or a reserve peace officer described in Section 830.6 who is employed or appointed by a law enforcement agency described in Section 830.1 and is authorized to carry a firearm on duty.SEC. 6. Section 27595.1 is added to the Penal Code, to read:27595.1. The Department of Justice is authorized to adopt regulations to implement Section 27595.SEC. 7. Section 32103 is added to the Penal Code, to read:32103. (a) A pistol may be submitted for testing described in Section 32010 and added to the roster described in subdivision (a) of Section 32015 without being subject to the requirements of subparagraph (D) or (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 31910, or the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 32010, if all of the following conditions are met:(1) The pistol was listed on the roster, described in subdivision (a) of Section 32015, on January 1, 2026.(2) The pistol was not subject to the requirements of subparagraph (D) or (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 31910 because it was submitted for testing before the dates identified in subdivision (d) of Section 32010.(3) The pistol was thereafter only modified to change design features which brought the pistol within the definition of machinegun-convertible pistol in Section 16885.(4) The modified pistol is submitted to an independent certified laboratory for testing pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 32000) of Chapter 4 before January 1, 2027.(b) Any firearm meeting the requirements of this section shall be removed from the roster according to subdivision (b) of Section 31910 on the same timeline as the pistol that appeared on the roster prior to being modified pursuant to this section.SEC. 8. If any section, subsection, sentence, or clause of this act is for any reason declared unconstitutional, invalid, or unenforceable by any court of competent jurisdiction, such decision shall not affect the constitutionality, validity, or enforceability of the remaining portions of this act or any part thereof. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have adopted this act notwithstanding the unconstitutionality, invalidity, or unenforceability of any one or more of its sections, subsections, sentences, or clauses.SEC. 9. Section 1.5 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 3273.50 of the Civil Code proposed by both this bill and Assembly Bill 1263. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each bill amends Section 3273.50 of the Civil Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after Assembly Bill 1263, in which case Section 1 of this bill shall not become operative.SEC. 10. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.